Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2499.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of education; administration; Arizona empowerment scholarship account program; intent A. The sum of $2,600,000 and 12 FTE positions are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of education to administer the Arizona empowerment scholarship account program established by section 15-2402, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.